Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Soil and Water Conservation

262.010.
Definitions.

“Board” means the board of supervisors of a conservation district;

“Commission” means the Conservation Commission;

“District” means a conservation district whenever used in KRS

262.010

to

262.660

or a watershed conservancy district whenever used in KRS

262.700

to

262.795

;

“Due notice” means notice published in accordance with the legal notice provisions of KRS Chapter 424;

“Infrastructure” means the plant and assets required for maintaining a district office;

“Land occupier” or “occupier of land” includes any person other than the landowner who is in possession of any lands lying within the district, whether as lessee or otherwise;

“Landowner” or “owner of land” includes any person who holds legal or equitable title to the land within the district determined as follows:

By his, her, or their names appearing on the recorded deed to the land;

By title derived through a probated will or by the laws of descent and distribution under KRS Chapter 391;

Where a minor or person adjudged mentally disabled is the owner of land within the district, the guardian or conservator or whoever has the power of attorney shall have the right to vote for such landowner under the provisions of KRS Chapter 262;

Where the will has not been probated by the date of the referendum or election as provided in KRS Chapter 262, the executor of the deceased landowner shall have the right to vote for the devisee or devisees;

Where the land within the districts is held in trust, the trustee shall have the right to vote for the landowner under the provisions of KRS Chapter 262;

A landowner shall be entitled to but one (1) vote whenever he is given the right to vote under KRS Chapter 262 regardless of the number of tracts or parcels of land which he owns either wholly or in part, within the district;

Where a trustee, executor, guardian, conservator, or other person with authority to vote for a landowner exercises such duty in relation to two (2) or more estates or tracts of land, within a district, such person shall have the right to vote separately for each such landowner which he represents within the district;

In the case of a dispute as to whether or not a person has the right to vote in an election or referendum under the provisions of KRS Chapter 262, the person seeking such right must provide to the satisfaction of the polling superintendent that he has the right to vote under this section.

“Supervisor” means one (1) of the members of the governing body of a conservation district.

History.

42i-3: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 117, § 1; 1966, ch. 23, § 59; 1966, ch. 239, § 179; 1972, ch. 99, § 1; 1982, ch. 141, § 78, effective July 1, 1982; 2007, ch. 51, § 1, effective June 26, 2007.

262.020.
Purpose of soil and water conservation district — Methods of achieving purpose.

The purpose of a soil and water conservation district is to conserve and develop all renewable natural resources within the district. In so doing, the district is authorized to undertake, sponsor, or participate in projects and activities which promote the conservation, development, maintenance and use of the land, water, trees and other renewable natural resources of the district. Such projects and activities shall include but not be limited to conservation practices on agricultural lands, the control of soil erosion, retardation of water runoff, the construction of flood prevention and control reservoirs, the maintenance of flood plains, the promotion of projects to assure an adequate municipal, industrial and agricultural supply of water, watershed stabilization, the avoidance and abatement of sedimentation and pollution in streams and other bodies of water, forestation and reforestation, the establishment of parks and outdoor recreation areas, the protection of open space, greenbelt areas and scenery, the preservation of wilderness areas, the protection of fish and wildlife, working for the location of highways, industries, housing developments, airports and other structures as are consistent with the district’s objectives and will offer the least possible interference with the conservation and best multiple use of the renewable natural resources, and all other activities consistent with the total natural resources development of the district.

History.

42i-2: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 64, § 1.

Opinions of Attorney General.

In view of the broad powers and purposes given to soil and water conservation districts by this section and the narrow scope of authority granted to watershed conservancy districts by KRS

262.700

through KRS

262.990

, it would appear that the former have stronger authority to employ engineers for the purpose of determining whether a specific proposed regional garbage disposal landfill will pollute the water of the watershed so as to interfere with existing water uses and to testify as to their findings in related legal proceedings.

OAG 82-88

.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Prohibiting or regulating removal or exploitation of oil and gas, minerals, soil, or other natural products within municipal limits. 10 A.L.R.3d 1226.

Validity of Zoning Regulations Prohibiting or Regulating Removal or Exploitation of Oil and Gas, Including Hydrofracking, 84 A.L.R.6th 133.

262.025.
Transfer of State Soil Conservation Committee functions to Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

All of the functions of the State Soil Conservation Committee provided in this chapter are hereby transferred to and shall be exercised by the Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. XIV, § 4; 1966, ch. 23, § 60.

262.030.
State Committee; membership; part of the Department of Conservation. [Repealed.]

262.040.
Chairman of committee; hearings; quorum. [Repealed.]

262.050.
Compensation of committee. [Repealed.]

262.060.
Committee to keep record; to adopt seal. [Repealed.]

262.070.
Assistance from other state agencies; delegation of duties. [Repealed.]

262.080.
Committee to have employes bonded. [Repealed.]

262.090.
Functions of state commission.

The commission shall:

Supervise the organization and discontinuance of soil conservation districts.

Supervise the appointment of members of soil conservation district boards of supervisors.

Secure the cooperation and assistance of other agencies of the federal, state and local governments in the development of a complete soil conservation program.

Perform such acts and promulgate such regulations as may be necessary to carry out its functions.

History.

42i-4: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 106, § 4; 1974, ch. 151, § 1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Administrative regulations, adoption date and effective date, KRS

13A.330

.

Soil and water resources commission to assist in soil conservation program, KRS

146.110

.

262.095.
Appropriations — How used.

Appropriations out of the State Treasury to finance the program of the Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall be paid out directly on the orders of the chairman, and shall be used to pay the expenses of the commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 120, § 1; 1950, ch. 106, § 5.

262.096.
Budget reports — What to include. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 120, § 2; repealed by 2019 ch. 50, § 7, effective June 27, 2019.

262.097.
Reports from districts — Compliance with KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090.

The supervisors of the respective soil conservation districts shall submit to the commission such statements, estimates, budgets, and other information at such time and in such manner as the commission requires.

The supervisors of the soil conservation districts shall comply with the provisions of KRS

65A.010

to

65A.090

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 120, § 3; 2013, ch. 40, § 71, effective March 21, 2013.

262.100.
Petition for district.

Any twenty-five (25) owners of land lying within the limits of the territory proposed to be organized into a district, and within counties that maintain a full-time county agricultural extension agent, may file a petition with the commission asking that a soil conservation district be organized to function in the territory described in the petition. The petition shall set forth:

The proposed name of the district;

A statement that there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare, for a district to function in the territory described in the petition;

A description of the territory proposed to be organized as a district, which description need not be given by metes and bounds or by legal subdivisions, but shall be sufficient if generally accurate;

A request that the commission define the boundaries for the district; that a referendum be held within the defined territory on the question of the creation of a district in that territory; and that the commission determine that a district be created.

Where more than one petition is filed covering parts of the same territory, the commission may consolidate all or any of those petitions.

History.

42i-5.

262.110.
Hearing on creation of district — Matters to be considered.

Within thirty (30) days after a petition has been filed with the commission under KRS

262.100

, it shall cause due notice to be given of a proposed hearing upon the questions of the desirability and necessity, in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare, of the creation of the district; of the appropriate boundaries to be assigned to the district; of the propriety of the petition and other proceedings taken under this chapter, and upon all questions relevant to such inquiries. All owners and occupiers of land within the limits of the territory described in the petition and of lands within any territory considered for addition to the described territory, and all other interested parties may attend the hearing and be heard.

If it appears upon the hearing that it may be desirable to include within the proposed district territory outside of the area within which due notice of the hearing has been given, the hearing shall be adjourned, due notice of further hearing shall be given throughout the entire area considered for inclusion in the district and a further hearing shall be held. After that hearing, if the commission determines, upon the facts presented at the hearing and upon other available relevant information, that there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare, for a district to function in the territory considered at the hearing, it shall make and record the determination, and shall define, by metes and bounds or by legal subdivisions, the boundaries of the district.

In making the determination and in defining the boundaries, the commission shall give weight and consideration to the topography of the area considered and that of the state; the composition of soils; the distribution of erosion; the prevailing land-use practices; the desirability and necessity of including within the boundaries the particular lands under consideration and the benefits those lands may receive from being included within the boundaries; the relation of the proposed area to existing watersheds and agricultural regions and to other districts already organized or proposed for organization under this chapter; and other relevant physical, geographical and economic factors, having regard to the legislative determinations set forth in KRS

262.020

. The territory to be included within the boundaries need not be contiguous. If the commission determines after the hearing, after consideration of the relevant facts, that there is no need for a district to function in the territory considered at the hearing, it shall make and record the determination and shall deny the petition.

History.

42i-5.

262.120.
Referendum on creation of district.

After the commission has made and recorded a determination that there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare, for the organization of a district in a particular territory and has defined the boundaries of that district, it shall consider the question whether the operation of a district within those boundaries with the powers conferred upon districts in this chapter is administratively practicable and feasible. To assist the commission in the determination of administrative practicability and feasibility, the commission shall, within a reasonable time after entry of the finding that there is need for the organization of the district and the determination of the boundaries of the district, hold a referendum within the proposed district upon the proposition of the creation of the district, and cause due notice of the referendum to be given. The question shall be submitted to the voters in the following form: “For creation of a soil conservation district of the lands below described and lying in the County (or Counties) of
. . . . . ,
. . . . . , and
. . . . . ” and “Against creation of a soil conservation district of the lands below described and lying in the County (or Counties) of
. . . . . , and
. . . . . ” The voter shall be instructed to vote “yes” for one or the other of the propositions, as the voter may favor or oppose creation of the district. The boundaries of the proposed district as determined by the commission shall be set forth. Only owners of lands lying within the boundaries of the territory, as determined by the commission, shall be eligible to vote in the referendum.

History.

42i-5: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 360, § 75, effective July 15, 1982.

262.130.
Commission to pay for and supervise conduct of referendum — Equal representation of opposing sides.

The commission shall pay all expenses for the issuance of notices and the conduct of the hearings and referendum provided for in KRS

262.110

and

262.120

, and shall supervise the conduct of the hearings and referendum. It shall issue appropriate regulations governing the conduct of the hearings and referendum and providing for the registration prior to the date of the referendum of all eligible voters, or prescribing some other appropriate procedure for the determination of the eligibility of voters in the referendum.

In all referendums under this chapter, provision shall be made for those opposing the establishment of a district or the adoption of any regulation to have equal representation with the proponents of the measure in the registration and determination of eligibility of voters, in the election officers, in the holding of the referendum, in the custody of the votes cast and in the canvassing and certifying of the returns.

History.

42i-5: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 360, § 76, effective July 15, 1982.

262.140.
Commission to determine feasibility of district when majority favor.

The commission shall publish the result of the referendum held under KRS

262.120

and shall then determine whether the operation of the district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible. If the commission determines that the operation of the district is not administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record the determination and deny the petition. If the commission determines that the operation of the district is administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record the determination and shall proceed with the organization of the district in the manner provided in KRS

262.150

. In making the determination the commission shall give regard and weight to the attitudes of the owners and occupiers of lands lying within the defined boundaries, the number of landowners eligible to vote in the referendum who have voted, the proportion of the votes cast in the referendum in favor of the creation of the district to the total number of votes cast, the approximate wealth and income of the landowners and occupiers of the proposed district, the probable expense of carrying on erosion-control operations within the district, and such other economic and social factors as may be relevant to the determination, having due regard to the legislative determinations set forth in KRS

262.020

.

The commission shall not determine that the operation of the proposed district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible unless at least a majority of the votes cast in the referendum upon the proposition of creation of the district have been cast in favor of creation of the district.

History.

42i-5.

262.150.
Appointment of district supervisors by commission — Qualifications — Term.

If the commission determines that the operation of the proposed district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible, it shall appoint three (3) supervisors to act with the four (4) supervisors elected as provided by KRS

262.220

and

262.240

.

The three (3) supervisors appointed under subsection (1) shall be persons who by training and experience are qualified to perform the services required of them by this chapter, and they shall serve until supervisors are elected at the next regular elections of supervisors as provided for under KRS

262.240

.

History.

42i-5, 42i-7: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 106, § 6; 1974, ch. 151, § 2.

262.160.
Supervisors to present application to Secretary of State and file statement of committee.

The three (3) supervisors appointed under KRS

262.150

shall present to the Secretary of State an application signed by them, which shall set forth the following:

Recitals that a petition for the creation of the district was filed with the commission pursuant to this chapter and that the proceedings were taken pursuant to the petition; that the application is being filed in order to complete the organization of the district as a governmental subdivision and a public body under this chapter; and that the commission has appointed them as supervisors.

The name and official residence of each of the supervisors, together with a certified copy of the appointments evidencing their right to office.

The term of office of each of the supervisors.

The name which is proposed for the district.

The location of the principal office of the supervisors of the district.

The application shall be subscribed and sworn to by each of the supervisors before an officer authorized to take and certify oaths, who shall certify upon the application that he personally knows the supervisors and knows them to be the officers as affirmed in the application, and that each has subscribed to the application in the officer’s presence.

The application shall be accompanied by a statement by the committee, which shall certify by mere recitals, that:

A petition was filed, notice was issued and hearing was held.

The commission determined that there was need, in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare, for a district to function in the proposed territory and defined the boundaries of the territory.

Notice was given and a referendum held on the question of the creation of the district and the result of the referendum showed a majority of the votes cast in the referendum to be in favor of the creation of the district.

The commission determined that the operation of the proposed district was administratively practicable and feasible.

The statement shall set forth the boundaries of the district as they have been defined by the commission.

History.

42i-5: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 151, § 3.

262.170.
Secretary of State to record application and issue certificate of creation.

The Secretary of State shall examine the application and statement and, if he finds that the name proposed for the district is not identical with that of any other district or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion or uncertainty, he shall receive and file the application and statement and record them in an appropriate book of record in his office.

If the Secretary of State finds that the name proposed for the district is identical with that of any other district or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, he shall certify that fact to the commission, which shall submit to the Secretary of State a new name which is not subject to such defects. Upon receipt of the new name, free of such defects, the Secretary of State shall record the application and statement, with the name so modified, in an appropriate book of record in his office.

When the application and statement have been made, filed and recorded, as provided in this section, the district shall come into existence as a public body corporate and politic. The Secretary of State shall make and issue to the supervisors a certificate, under the seal of the state, as to the organization of the district, and shall record a copy of the certificate with the application and statement.

In any action involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to, any contract or action of the district, the district shall be deemed to have been established in accordance with this chapter upon proof of the issuance of the certificate by the Secretary of State. A copy of the certificate properly certified by the Secretary of State shall be admissible in evidence in any such action and shall be proof of the filing and contents of the certificate.

History.

42i-5.

262.180.
Territory included in district — Addition of territory — Procedure.

The territory of a district shall include all lands lying within the boundaries of a district, including incorporated cities and towns.

Petitions for including additional territory within an existing district may be filed with the commission, and the proceedings provided for by KRS

262.100

to

262.180

in the case of petitions to organize a district shall be observed as far as may be practicable in the case of petitions for inclusion. The commission shall prescribe the form for such petitions, which shall be as nearly as may be in the form prescribed by KRS

262.100

for petitions to organize a district. The Secretary of State shall receive the application for inclusion of the area within the district and shall attach such application to the original file containing the papers by which such district was organized. Where the total number of landowners in the area proposed for inclusion is less than twenty-five (25), the petition may be filed when signed by a majority of the landowners of the area, and in that case, no referendum need be held. In a referendum upon a petition for inclusion of additional territory, all owners of land lying within the proposed additional area shall be eligible to vote.

History.

42i-5: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 61; 1968, ch. 64, § 2; 1972, ch. 99, § 2; 2019 ch. 44, § 30, effective June 27, 2019.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where a soil conservation district had previously levied a real property tax on all taxable real estate parcels of five (5) acres or more, the amendment of subsection (4) of KRS

262.200

to tax all real property would not, as applied, distinguish between old and new property, including houses and lots under five (5) acres.

OAG 81-174

.

262.190.
When subsequent petitions may be filed after denial.

After the expiration of six (6) months from the date of entry of a determination by the commission, denying a petition for a proposed district, subsequent petitions covering the same or substantially the same territory may be filed and action taken thereon in accordance with KRS

262.100

to

262.180

.

History.

42i-5.

262.200.
Nature of district — Governing body — Corporate powers — Operating funds.

A district shall constitute a governmental subdivision of the state and public body corporate and politic, exercising public power.

The governing body of the district shall consist of a board of seven (7) supervisors. On organization of a district, the first two (2) supervisors shall be appointed by the committee as provided in KRS

262.150

, and five (5) shall be elected under KRS

262.210

and

262.220

. The supervisors shall hold no other city, county, or state elective office. Where the need for urban representation on the board of supervisors exists, it shall be limited to three (3) members.

The board may sue and be sued in the name of the district; have a seal, which shall be judicially noticed; have perpetual succession unless terminated as provided in KRS

262.530

to

262.560

; make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to exercise its powers.

The board may request annual operating funds from the fiscal court. To support the request, the board shall present to the fiscal court a report of the previous year’s operation, a long range plan for natural resource development, and an annual plan of work. Should a fiscal court fail to approve a requested budget, it shall present a specific list of objections and suggested corrections to the board in writing and within a reasonable time. If a budget request is not approved, the board may submit a revised budget request. Funds for an approved budget shall be supplied either from general funds or from the levy of a millage tax on all real property within the boundaries of the county. The tax shall be collected in the same manner as other county taxes, and shall be credited to the board. The funds so collected shall be expended by the board for the employment of soil conservation aids and for other purposes directly associated with the program, including promotional activities, prize moneys, office equipment and supplies, and incidentals deemed necessary.

History.

42i-5, 42i-7, 42i-8: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 106, § 7; 1958, ch. 151; 1972, ch. 99, § 3; 1980, ch. 199, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 272, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since levying a tax under this section was a nonjudicial act of the fiscal court, the court could rescind its order so long as no contract right was involved.

OAG 62-671

.

A soil conservation district could not be held liable for a $10.00 license fee required by ordinance to be paid by employers before the commencement of business.

OAG 62-1014

.

A watershed conservancy district, being a subdistrict of a soil conservation district, is a governmental subdivision of the state and a public body exercising public power.

OAG 63-637

.

A county soil conservation district board may request and the fiscal court of such county may levy a tax of two cents ($0.02) per acre, even though such tax rate is an increase from the rate levied in previous years.

OAG 67-346

.

The offices of city treasurer and county soil and water conservation district supervisor under subsection (2) of this section are not incompatible.

OAG 71-230

.

This section, as amended in 1972 by ch. 99, § 3, seems to indicate from the use of the term “upon” that the fiscal court has the option of examining the budget of the board and that the budget provisions must be agreed to by the fiscal court and the board and it is only after formal approval of the budget by the court that it becomes mandatory upon it to provide the necessary operating funds.

OAG 72-335

.

A school board member may not serve on a soil conservation district board of supervisors.

OAG 72-683

.

The available funds derived pursuant to this section and the funds and assets transferred from a defunct district must first be expended for proper maintenance of present improvements as provided in KRS 262.793(2) but the excess each year, if any, may be used for existing and new improvements and practices as provided in KRS 262.793(1).

OAG 74-596

.

A soil and water conservation district is a separate governmental subdivision of the state, a public body corporate and politic and does not constitute a municipality, county or agency of state government.

OAG 79-149

.

Under this section, as amended in 1980, once the district board’s budget has been submitted to and finally approved by the fiscal court, it is mandatory that the fiscal court fund the budget either from the county’s general fund or by levying the millage ad valorem tax, not to exceed $25,000 for a fiscal year, because subsection (4) of this section says that the funds “shall be supplied;” since the millage ad valorem tax is not a voted levy, and since the tax is characterized by subsection (4) of this section as a “county tax,” the roll-back restrictions of KRS

68.245

apply.

OAG 80-260

.

The county sheriff is authorized under KRS

262.770

to pursue delinquent soil and water conservation district taxes just as he would in the case of delinquent state and county taxes, including advertising the sale of delinquent tax claims under former KRS

134.440

(now repealed), since these taxes are considered county taxes under this section.

OAG 81-112

.

The amendment of subsection (4) of this section to limit the maximum total tax revenue from real property millage tax to $25,000 per year does not unconstitutionally impact upon KRS

132.023

, since the General Assembly may constitutionally levy rates which lessen taxes.

OAG 81-174

.

Where a soil conservation district had previously levied a real property tax on all taxable real estate parcels of five (5) acres or more, the amendment of subsection (4) of this section to tax all real property would not, as applied, distinguish between old and new property, including houses and lots under five acres.

OAG 81-174

.

Funds derived from a soil conservation tax imposed under this section are not included in the computation of the 4% increase in revenue permitted under KRS

68.245

. Since the soil and water conservation tax is not subject to KRS

68.245

, it necessarily follows that the revenue it produces should not be included in the calculations of permissible rates for other taxes that are subject to KRS 68.245.

OAG 92-113

.

The tax authorized by this section is not subject to the rate rollback provisions of KRS

68.245

. Since this section’s tax already contains its own rollback provision, there is no need to subject it to the additional rollback mechanism in KRS

68.245

. To do so would render the expressed $25,000 ceiling in this section meaningless.

OAG 92-113

(overruling

OAG 80-260

to the extent of conflict).

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Department of law, KRS ch. 15.

262.210.
Nomination of supervisors by petition.

Nominating petitions shall be filed with the clerk of the county in which the district lies to nominate candidates for supervisors of the district. Such petitions shall be filed by at least the last date prescribed by the election law generally for filing certificates of nomination prior to a general election. Such petitions shall be filed no later than 4 p.m. local time at the place of filing when filed on the last date on which such papers are permitted to be filed. Each nominating petition shall be subscribed by twenty-five (25) or more qualified voters who are residents of the territory to be encompassed by the district. Resident qualified voters may join in nominating by petition more than one (1) candidate for supervisor. The nominating petition shall state the residence and post office address of each candidate, that he is legally qualified to hold the office, and that the subscribers desire, and are legally qualified, to vote for the candidate. The county clerk shall certify the nomination and election of supervisors to the commission.

History.

42i-6: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 151, § 4; 1984, ch. 185, § 29, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 185, § 5, effective January 1, 1987; 1986, ch. 470, § 42, effective July 15, 1986.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was amended by two 1986 Acts which do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled together.

262.220.
Election for supervisors — County clerk’s duties.

The county clerk shall cause the names of all nominees on behalf of whom nominating petitions have been filed under KRS

262.210

to be prepared for presentation to the voters in the regular elections as provided in KRS

117.145

. In counties encompassing more than one (1) soil and water conservation district, where portions of more than one (1) district are within the boundaries of a single voting precinct, separate votes shall be taken for the election of supervisors. The election of soil and water conservation district supervisors shall be subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 118 for the conduct of regular elections, except that the cost of placing the names of the nominees before the voters shall be borne by the commission.

History.

42i-6: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 106, § 8; 1972, ch. 99, § 4; 1974, ch. 151, § 5; 1980, ch. 188, § 236, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 360, § 77, effective July 15, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Conduct of regular elections, KRS ch. 118.

262.230.
Board chairman — Quorum.

The board shall select a chairman and may, from time to time, change that selection.

A majority of the supervisors shall constitute a quorum and the concurrence of a majority shall be necessary for a determination of the board.

History.

42i-7.

262.240.
Supervisors’ terms — Nomination and election — Vacancies — Compensation — Removal.

A supervisor’s term begins on January 1 following his election. The two (2) supervisors elected in the general election of 1974 shall be elected for a term of two (2) years. In 1976 a general election shall be conducted for seven (7) supervisors. The four (4) supervisors elected with the highest number of votes in the general election of 1976 shall serve for four (4) years; the other three (3) supervisors elected in 1976 shall serve for two (2) years. In the event only seven (7) nominating petitions for supervisors are filed, the commission shall declare the nominees elected without an election, and shall name four (4) of the nominees to serve terms of four (4) years, and three (3) to serve terms of two (2) years. Thereafter supervisors shall be elected for four (4) years as their terms expire. Nominating petitions for supervisors shall be filed with the county clerk not later than the last date prescribed by the election law generally for filing certificates and petitions of nomination. No such nominating petition shall be accepted by the clerk unless it is signed by twenty-five (25) or more qualified resident voters of the district. Qualified resident voters may sign more than one (1) nominating petition to nominate more than one (1) candidate for supervisor. In the event nominating petitions for only the number of supervisors to be elected are filed, the commission shall declare the nominees elected without holding an election. The county clerk shall examine the petition of each candidate to determine whether it is regular on its face. If there is an error, the county clerk shall notify the candidate by certified mail within twenty-four (24) hours of filing.

A supervisor shall hold office until his successor has been elected and has qualified. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the commission.

A supervisor may be reimbursed for expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of his duties and may be paid a per diem for attending meetings or otherwise discharging the obligations of his office.

A supervisor shall be a resident of the county or district in which he serves as a supervisor, and upon moving from the county or district, the supervisor shall be ineligible to serve as a supervisor and his office shall be vacant.

A supervisor who has been declared elected without an election pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may be removed from office by the commission in the same manner as provided by KRS

65.007

for removal of an appointed member of the governing body of a special district.

History.

42i-7: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 106, § 9; 1960, ch. 68, Art. XIV, § 5; 1962, ch. 26; 1974, ch. 151, § 6; 1980, ch. 18, § 22, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 185, § 30, effective July 13, 1984.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A member of the board of supervisors of a conservation district is a local, subdivisional officer and may potentially receive per diem and expenses for serving as such and a state officer could not hold the supervisor’s position because of the prohibition of KRS 61.080(1) and Ky. Const., § 165, but were he not a state officer but a state employee the dual positions would not violate these sections; however, since a member of the board of supervisors receives a per diem it constitutes a paid public office and a person serving as both a member of the board of supervisors and as a state officer or employee would be in violation of KRS 18.310(4) (now

18A.140

).

OAG 76-430

.

262.250.
Board may hire employees, delegate functions and bond employees.

The board may employ such employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and shall determine their qualifications, duties and compensation.

The board may delegate to the chairman, to one or more supervisors, or to one or more agents or employees such powers and duties as it may deem proper.

The supervisors shall provide for the execution of surety bonds for all employees and officers who are entrusted with funds or property.

History.

42i-7.

Opinions of Attorney General.

It is legal for a soil conservation district to employ a person as an aide although such person was also a member of the fiscal court which levied a tax for the benefit of the district.

OAG 63-87

.

262.260.
Designation of city or county representative to consult with board — Appropriation by city or county to assist in program.

The board may by resolution invite the legislative body of any city and/or administrative body of any county (fiscal court) in which the district is located or nearby, to select a representative to consult with the board of the district on all questions of program and policy which may affect the property, water supply, or other interests of the city or county, and to request by resolution that said city and/or county participate wholly or partially in any expense attendant to the execution of any program and/or policy, setting forth in said resolution all details of the program and/or policy together with an estimated annual cost. Should said legislative body approve said program and/or policy, it may expend funds out of its respective tax levy to assist in said program and/or policy.

History.

42i-7: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 83.

262.270.
Board may make regulations.

To carry into effect the purposes of this chapter, the board may make, and from time to time amend and repeal, regulations not inconsistent with this chapter.

History.

42i-8.